el: Τύπος συνδετήρα τροφοδοσίας: Molex 4-pin; Καμία; PCIe 6-pin; PCIe 8-pin; SATA 15-pin; Άλλο
lt-LT: Maitinimo jungties tipas: Molex 4 kontaktų; Nėra; PCIe 6 kontaktų; PCIe 8 kontaktų; SATA 15 kontaktų; Kita
nb: Strømkontakttype: Molex 4-pinners; Ingen; PCIe 6-pinners; PCIe 8-pinners; SATA 15-pinners; Annet
it: Tipo di connettore di alimentazione: Molex 4 pin; Nessuna; PCIe 6 pin; PCIe 8 pin; SATA 15 pin; Altro
hr-HR: Tip konektora za napajanje: Molex 4-pinski; Nema; PCIe 6-pinski; PCIe 8-pinski; SATA 15-pinski; Ostalo
de: Stromsteckertyp: Molex 4-polig; Keine; PCIe 6-polig; PCIe 8-polig; SATA 15-polig; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Typ napájacieho konektora: Molex 4-pin; Žiadny; PCIe 6-pin; PCIe 8-pin; SATA 15-pin; Iné
en: Power connector type: Molex 4-pin; None; PCIe 6-pin; PCIe 8-pin; SATA 15-pin; Other
bg-BG: Тип захранващ конектор: Molex 4-пинов; Няма; PCIe 6-пинов; PCIe 8-пинов; SATA 15-пинов; Други
cs: Typ napájecího konektoru: Molex 4pinový; Žádný; PCIe 6pinový; PCIe 8pinový; SATA 15pinový; Jiné
nl: Type voedingsconnector: Molex 4-pins; Geen; PCIe 6-pins; PCIe 8-pins; SATA 15-pins; Andere
vi: Loại bộ nối nguồn: Molex 4 chân; Không có; PCIe 6 chân; PCIe 8 chân; SATA 15 chân; Khác
ko: 전원 커넥터 유형: 몰렉스 4핀; 없음; PCIe 6핀; PCIe 8핀; SATA 15핀; 기타
sv: Strömkontakttyp: Molex 4-polig; Inga; PCIe 6-polig; PCIe 8-polig; SATA 15-polig; Övrigt
es: Tipo de conector de alimentación: Molex de 4 pines; Ninguno; PCIe de 6 pines; PCIe de 8 pines; SATA de 15 pines; Otros
ro-RO: Tip de conector de alimentare: Molex 4 pini; Niciuna; PCIe 6 pini; PCIe 8 pini; SATA 15 pini; Altele
fi: Virtaliitin tyyppi: Molex 4-nastainen; Ei mitään; PCIe 6-nastainen; PCIe 8-nastainen; SATA 15-nastainen; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de conector de energia: Molex 4 pinos; Nenhum; PCIe 6 pinos; PCIe 8 pinos; SATA 15 pinos; Outro
sl-SI: Tip napajalnega priključka: Molex 4-pinski; Brez; PCIe 6-pinski; PCIe 8-pinski; SATA 15-pinski; Drugo
hu: Tápcsatlakozó típusa: Molex 4 tűs; Egyik sem; PCIe 6 tűs; PCIe 8 tűs; SATA 15 tűs; Egyéb
zh-CN: 电源连接器类型: Molex 4 针; 无; PCIe 6 针; PCIe 8 针; SATA 15 针; 其他
tr: Güç konnektörü tipi: Molex 4 pin; Hiçbiri; PCIe 6 pin; PCIe 8 pin; SATA 15 pin; Diğer
pl: Typ złącza zasilania: Molex 4-pinowy; Brak; PCIe 6-pinowy; PCIe 8-pinowy; SATA 15-pinowy; Inne
da: Strømstiktype: Molex 4-polet; Ingen; PCIe 6-polet; PCIe 8-polet; SATA 15-polet; Andet
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อพลังงาน: Molex 4 ขา; ไม่มี; PCIe 6 ขา; PCIe 8 ขา; SATA 15 ขา; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип разъема питания: Molex 4-контактный; Нет; PCIe 6-контактный; PCIe 8-контактный; SATA 15-контактный; Другой
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de energia: Molex de 4 pinos; Nenhum; PCIe de 6 pinos; PCIe de 8 pinos; SATA de 15 pinos; Outro
ja: 電源コネクタータイプ: Molex 4ピン; なし; PCIe 6ピン; PCIe 8ピン; SATA 15ピン; その他
zh-TW: 電源連接器類型: Molex 4針; 無; PCIe 6針; PCIe 8針; SATA 15針; 其他
fr: Type de connecteur d’alimentation: Molex 4 broches; Aucune; PCIe 6 broches; PCIe 8 broches; SATA 15 broches; Autre